Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 50 LIVESTOCK HEALTH ACT
35-50-120. Information sharing and analysis.

Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, information obtained and maintained by the commissioner pursuant to this article and rules promulgated pursuant to this article and the results of surveillance and investigations may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection, except as provided by court order, during the investigatory period and until the matter is dismissed without further action or until a quarantine is issued.

As to any enforcement actions taken or the imposition of civil penalties, complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of the commissioner's investigations may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection, except to the person in interest, as defined in section 24-72-202 (4), C.R.S., or as provided by court order, during the investigatory period and until dismissed or until notice of hearing and charges are served on a respondent or other official action is taken.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article R&RE, p. 460, § 1, effective December 1.

35-50-121. Rights of secured parties.

Each secured party, whose security interest in the subject livestock appears in the list of effective filings as maintained by the central filing officer pursuant to the "Central Filing of Effective Financing Statement Act", article 9.5 of title 4, C.R.S., prior to the commissioner's payment to the owner of any excess sales proceeds pursuant to section 35-50-109 (7); prior to the issuance to the owner of the state's certificate of indebtedness pursuant to section 35-50-114 (1); or prior to the commissioner's authorization of payment of indemnity pursuant to section 35-50-114 (2) shall have a right to the proceeds of any such payment or indemnity or to such certificate of indebtedness, which is prior to that of the owner, and the commissioner or the governor, as the case may be, shall cause the foregoing to be paid or issued jointly to each such secured party and to the owner.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article R&RE, p. 461, § 1, effective December 1.

Editor's note:

The former § 35-50-121 was relocated to § 35-50-105 in 2005.

35-50-122. Saving clause.

Nothing in this article diminishes or supersedes the concurrent jurisdiction or the authorities of the parks and wildlife commission or the agriculture commission to regulate captive wildlife and alternative livestock.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article R&RE, p. 461, § 1, effective December 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1238, § 102, effective June 4.